District of Columbia statutes.
46-407

Repealed

Celebration of marriage by unauthorized persons.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1392, ch. 854, § 1289
Apr. 29, 2004, D.C. Law 15-154, § 3(m), 50 DCR 10996
1981 Ed., § 30-107.
1973 Ed., § 30-107.